Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Historic Resources.
§ 10.1-2213.
Procedure for appropriation of state funds for historic preservation.

No state funds, other than for the maintenance and operation of those facilities specified in §

10.1-2211

or

10.1-2212

and for the purchase of property for preservation of historical resources by the Virginia Land Conservation Foundation as provided in Chapter 10.2 (§

10.1-1017

et seq.) of this title, shall be appropriated or expended for or to organizations, whether localities or private entities, as set forth in the general appropriations act for: (i) the maintenance of collections and exhibits; (ii) the maintenance, operation, and interpretation of historic sites and facilities owned or operated by such organizations; or (iii) operational and educational activities pursuant to subsection C unless:

A request and completed application for state aid is filed by the organization with the Department, on forms prescribed by the Department, on or before October 1 prior to each regular session of the General Assembly in an even-numbered year. Requests shall be considered by the Governor and the General Assembly only in even-numbered years. The Department shall review each application made by an organization for state aid prior to consideration by the General Assembly. The Department shall provide a timely review of any amendments proposed by members of the General Assembly to the chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. The review shall examine the merits of each request, including data showing the percentage of federal, local, or private funds raised by the organization for the proposed project. The review and analysis provided by the Department shall be strictly advisory. The Department shall forward to the Department of Planning and Budget any application that is not for the maintenance of collections and exhibits or for the maintenance, operation, and interpretation of historic sites and facilities. Such applications shall be governed by the procedures identified in § 2.2-1505.

Any such private organization shall certify to the satisfaction of the Department that matching funds from federal, local, or private sources are available in an amount at least equal to the amount of the request in cash or in kind contributions which are deemed acceptable to the Department. These matching funds must be concurrent with the project for which the state grant is requested. Contributions received and spent prior to the state grant shall not be considered in satisfying the requirements of this subdivision.

Any such private organization shall provide documentation of its tax exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

Such organization shall certify that the applicant has read and acknowledged all information and requirements regarding how the grants will be administered and how funds will be disbursed.

Such organization shall state in its application the purpose of the grant. The grant recipient must justify and request in writing approval by the Department for changes in the scope of the project prior to implementing those changes. If grant funds are used for something other than the purpose for which they were requested without prior review and approval by the Department, then all state funds must be returned.

Such organization shall submit documentation on match funding and approved expenditures shall be submitted with all requests for disbursement.

Such organization shall provide progress reports as prescribed by the Department. At a minimum such reports shall be submitted with reimbursement requests and a final report at the conclusion of the project.

Such organization receiving the state grant shall comply with applicable state procurement requirements pursuant to the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§ 2.2-4300 et seq.).

In the case of new construction or ground disturbing activities funded by state grants, the organization shall afford the Department an opportunity to review the potential impact on any historic resources. Such review shall be provided by the Department within 15 days of receipt of completed information.

For all state grants for capital projects, whether for new construction, rehabilitation, restoration, or reconstruction, funds shall be disbursed only as reimbursement for approved activities.For the purposes of this section, no grant shall be approved for private institutions of higher education or religious organizations.

In addition to the requirements of subsection A of this section, no state funds other than for those facilities specified in §

10.1-2211

or

10.1-2212

shall be appropriated or expended for the rehabilitation, restoration, or reconstruction of any historic site unless:

The property is designated as a historic landmark by the Board and is located on the register prepared by the Department pursuant to §

10.1-2202

or has been declared eligible by the Board for such designation but has not actually been placed on the register of buildings and sites provided for in §

10.1-2202

;

The organization owning such property and any organization managing such property, if different from the owner, enter into an agreement with the Department that the property will be open to the public for at least 100 days per year for no less than five years following completion of the project for which state funds are received;

The organization owning the property and any organization managing the project, if different from the owner, submit the plans and specifications of the project to the Department for review and approval to ensure that the project meets generally accepted standards for historic preservation; and

The organization owning the property grants to the Commonwealth a perpetual easement placing restrictions on alterations to, or development of, the property satisfactory to the Board, if the organization has received $50,000 or more within a four-year period pursuant to this section. The easement shall be for the purpose of preserving those features of the property which led to its designation as a historic landmark.Nothing contained in this subsection shall prohibit any organization from charging a reasonable admission fee during the five-year period required in subdivision 2 herein if the fee is comparable to fees charged at similar facilities in the area.

The Department shall be responsible for the administration of this section and §§

10.1-2211

and

10.1-2212

and the disbursement of all funds appropriated thereto.State funds appropriated for the operation of historical societies, museums, foundations, associations, or other such organizations shall be expended for historical facilities, reenactments, meetings, conferences, tours, seminars, or other general operating expenses as may be specified in the general appropriations act. Funds appropriated for these purposes shall be distributed annually to the treasurers of any such organizations. The appropriations act shall clearly designate that all such funds are to be used for the operating expenses of such organization.

History.

1981, c. 537, § 10-145.13; 1987, c. 481; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-814; 1989, cc. 656, 711; 1992, cc. 138, 426; 1999, cc. 900, 906; 2005, c. 86; 2010, c. 291.

Editor’s note.

For § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 U.S.C.S. § 501(c)(3).

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 385 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “In emergency situations which shall be defined as those posing a threat to life, safety or property, §

10.1-2213

, Code of Virginia, shall not apply.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees” in subdivision A 1. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 900 and 906 are identical, and substituted “Land Conservation” for “Conservation and Recreation” in subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 86, in subsection A, substituted “operation, and interpretation” for “and operation” in the introductory language and subdivision 1, inserted “and completed application” and substituted “July 1 prior to” for “the opening day of” in subdivision 1, and added subdivisions 4 through 10; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 291, in the introductory language of subsection A, substituted “organizations, whether localities or private entities” for “historical societies, museums, foundations, associations, or local governments,” inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designations and added clause (iii); in subdivision A 1, substituted “October 1” for “July 1” in the first sentence, substituted “federal, local, or private funds” for “nonstate funds” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “historic sites and facilities” for “sites and facilities owned by historical organizations” in the seventh sentence; in the first sentence of subdivision A 2, substituted “Any such private” for “Such” and inserted “federal”; substituted “Any such private” for “Such” in subdivision A 3; inserted “state” in the first sentence of subdivision A 9; in subdivision A 10, inserted “state” near the beginning and substituted “restoration, or reconstruction” for “or restoration”; substituted “rehabilitation, restoration, or reconstruction of any historic site” for “renovation or reconstruction of any historic site as set forth in § 2.2-1505” in the introductory language of subsection B; rewrote subdivision B 2, which read: “The society, museum, foundation, or association owning such property enters into an agreement with the Department that the property will be open to the public for at least 100 days per year for no less than five years following completion, renovation, or reconstruction”; substituted “owning the property and any organization managing the project, if different from the owner, submit” for “submits” in subdivision B 3; substituted “alterations to” for “the use” in the first sentence of subdivision B 4; and substituted “associations, or other such organizations” for “and associations” in the first sentence of the last paragraph of subsection C.

§ 10.1-2213.1.
Matching grants for contributions to a material restoration of a Presidential home.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Charitable contribution” means a cash contribution from an individual, estate, corporation, partnership, trust, foundation, fund, association or any other entity or organization provided that (i) the contribution is allowable as a deduction for federal tax purposes or (ii) would have been allowable as a deduction for federal tax purposes had the entity or organization been subject to federal taxes.“Eligible restoration expenses” means expenses incurred in the material restoration of a historic presidential home and, except in the case of demolition necessary to accomplish the restoration plan, added to the property’s capital account.“Foundation” means an entity that is exempt from federal taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as may be amended, that is primarily responsible for the material restoration of a historic presidential home.“Historic presidential home” means any home of a President of the United States located in Orange County, Virginia that is individually designated as a National Historic Landmark by the United States Secretary of the Interior.“Material restoration” means restoration work (i) that restores a historic presidential home to within the period of significance stated in the National Historic Landmark individual designation of such home by the United States Secretary of the Interior, (ii) that is consistent with “The Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for Restoration,” and (iii) the cost of which amounts to at least 50 percent of the assessed value of such home for local real estate tax purposes for the year prior to the initial expenditure of any eligible restoration expenses, unless such home is an owner-occupied building, in which case the cost shall amount to at least 25 percent of the assessed value of such home for local real estate tax purposes for the year prior to the initial expenditure of any eligible restoration expenses.

The Commonwealth shall provide matching grants for charitable contributions received on or after July 1, 2003, by the Foundation that are actually spent or expended by the Foundation in the material restoration of a historic presidential home. The amount of the matching grant to be paid by the Commonwealth shall equal $0.20 for each $1 of charitable contribution that is actually spent or expended by the Foundation in the material restoration of a historic presidential home.

In January of each calendar year the Foundation shall submit to the Director the total amount of charitable contributions it received that were actually spent or expended in the immediately preceding calendar year for the material restoration of a historic presidential home. As a condition of receiving a matching grant, the Foundation shall at the same time submit to the Director such other information requested by the Director that is reasonably necessary to verify such charitable contributions and the actual use of such contributions.The Director shall, as soon as practicable after receiving such submission and verifying such charitable contributions and their actual expenditure for the material restoration of a historic presidential home, make a written certification to the Comptroller of the amount of the grant to be paid to the Foundation. The amount of the grant for each calendar year shall be paid to the Foundation in six equal annual installments on March 15 of each year beginning with the year of the Director’s certification for the relevant calendar year.

In no case shall the total amount of grants paid under this section exceed 20 percent of the estimated eligible restoration expenses of the historic presidential home. The Director is authorized to suspend the processing of charitable contribution submissions made by the Foundation if the Director reasonably believes that (i) such maximum amount may be exceeded or (ii) the material restoration will not be performed or such restoration work has been indefinitely suspended.

History.

2005, c. 470.

Editor’s note.

For § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 U.S.C.S. § 501(c)(3).

Acts 2005, c. 470, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Historic Resources shall develop and publish guidelines for purposes of implementing the provisions of this act. The guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, processes and procedures for identifying and establishing requirements for charitable contributions that are actually spent or expended for the material restoration of a historic presidential home located in Orange County, Virginia. Such guidelines shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 10.1-2214.
Underwater historic property; penalty.

“Underwater historic property” means any submerged shipwreck, vessel, cargo, tackle or underwater archaeological specimen, including any object found at underwater refuse sites or submerged sites of former habitation, that has remained unclaimed on the state-owned subaqueous bottom and has historic value as determined by the Department.

Underwater historic property shall be preserved and protected and shall be the exclusive property of the Commonwealth. Preservation and protection of such property shall be the responsibility of all state agencies including but not limited to the Department, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission. Insofar as may be practicable, such property shall be preserved, protected and displayed for the public benefit within the county or city within which it is found, or within a museum operated by a state agency.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to conduct any type of recovery operations involving the removal, destruction or disturbance of any underwater historic property without first applying for and receiving a permit from the Virginia Marine Resources Commission to conduct such operations pursuant to § 28.2-1203. If the Virginia Marine Resources Commission, with the concurrence of the Department and in consultation with the Virginia Institute of Marine Science and other concerned state agencies, finds that granting the permit is in the best interest of the Commonwealth, it shall grant the applicant a permit. The permit shall provide that all objects recovered shall be the exclusive property of the Commonwealth. The permit shall provide the applicant with a fair share of the objects recovered, or in the discretion of the Department, a reasonable percentage of the cash value of the objects recovered to be paid by the Department. Title to all objects recovered shall be retained by the Commonwealth unless or until they are released to the applicant by the Department. All recovery operations undertaken pursuant to a permit issued under this section shall be carried out under the general supervision of the Department and in accordance with § 28.2-1203 and in such a manner that the maximum amount of historical, scientific, archaeological and educational information may be recovered and preserved in addition to the physical recovery of items. The Virginia Marine Resources Commission shall not grant a permit to conduct operations at substantially the same location described and covered by a permit previously granted if recovery operations are being actively pursued, unless the holder of the previously granted permit concurs in the grant of another permit.

The Department may seek a permit pursuant to this section and § 28.2-1203 to preserve and protect or recover any underwater historic property.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and, in addition, shall forfeit to the Commonwealth any objects recovered.

History.

1984, c. 750, § 10-262; 1988, c. 891, § 10.1-817; 1989, c. 656.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to authority of Commission over submerged lands, see § 28.2-1204.